Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 2. Administration

§ 5211.
Duties of the Director.

The Director shall:

provide general information to applicants for licensure as foresters;

receive applications for licensure and provide licenses to applicants qualified under this chapter;

provide standards and approve education programs for applicants and for the benefit of foresters who are reentering practice following a lapse of five or more years;

administer fees as established by law;

refer all disciplinary matters to an administrative law officer;

renew, revoke, and reinstate licenses as ordered by an administrative law officer; and

explain appeal procedures to licensed foresters and to applicants, and complaint procedures to the public.

The Director may adopt rules necessary to perform his or her duties under this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 5212.
Advisor appointees.

The Secretary of State shall appoint three foresters for five-year staggered terms to serve at the Secretary’s pleasure as advisors in matters relating to forestry. One of the initial appointments shall be for less than a five-year term.
(a) (1) The Secretary of State shall appoint three foresters for five-year staggered terms to serve at the Secretary’s pleasure as advisors in matters relating to forestry. One of the initial appointments shall be for less than a five-year term.

An appointee shall have not less than ten years’ experience as a forester immediately preceding appointment, shall be licensed as a forester in Vermont, and shall be actively engaged in the practice of forestry in this State during incumbency.

The Director shall seek the advice of the forestry advisor appointees in carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 166

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.